Maryland, session 2026, HB0552.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
SUBTITLE 10. THE COMMISSION ON THE HOUSE OF REFORMATION AND
INSTRUCTION FOR COLORED CHILDREN.
6–1001.
(a) There shall be an Independent Investigation of the House of Reformation and
Instruction for Colored Children.
(b) The purpose of the Independent Investigation is to:
(1) investigate the history, operations, and resident deaths at the House of
Reformation and Instruction for Colored Children; and

HOUSE BILL 552 3
(2) provide a complete and public accounting of the children who died and
were buried on the grounds of the House of Reformation and Instruction for Colored
Children and the circumstances surrounding their deaths.
(c) (1) (i) The Independent Investigation shall be conducted by a Principal
Independent Investigator, appointed by the Chair and ranking member of the Senate
Judicial Proceedings Committee and the Chair and ranking member of the House Judiciary
Committee.
(ii) The Principal Independent Investigator shall have significant
experience in:
1. leading complex criminal or civil investigations;
2. stakeholder and community collaboration;
3. civil rights law;
4. restorative justice; or
5. historical inquiry.
(2) (i) The Principal Independent Investigator may appoint two Deputy
Independent Investigators to assist in the operational work of the investigation.
(ii) The Deputy Independent Investigators shall have significant
experience in:
1. criminal or civil investigations;
2. juvenile justice administration and operations;
3. conditions of confinement for youth; or
4. racial disparities in the justice system.
(d) (1) This section may not be construed to grant the Principal Independent
Investigator and Deputy Independent Investigators prosecutorial authority.
(2) If the investigation uncovers evidence of criminal conduct, the Principal
Independent Investigator and Deputy Independent Investigators shall refer such evidence
to the Attorney General or appropriate State’s Attorney.
(e) Notwithstanding Division II of the State Finance and Procurement Article of
the Annotated Code of Maryland, the Principal Independent Investigator has the authority
to approve contracts to retain subject matter consultants and entities to meet the needs of
the Independent Investigation.

HOUSE BILL 552
(f) The Independent Investigation shall:
(1) use ground–penetrating radar and other modern archaeological
methods to locate and map all unmarked graves at the site of the House of Reformation
and Instruction for Colored Children;
(2) determine the total number of individuals buried at the site of the
House of Reformation and Instruction for Colored Children;
(3) where necessary and appropriate, consistent with best practices and
with consultation from descendant communities, conduct the exhumation and forensic
analysis of remains to determine age, ancestry, cause of death, and evidence of trauma or
neglect;
(4) collect DNA samples from remains to establish a database for matching
with potential descendants;
(5) review all available records from the Maryland State Archives, the
Department of Juvenile Services, the Maryland Department of Health, and any other
relevant State or local agencies to identify every child who died at the House of Reformation
and Instruction for Colored Children;
(6) reconstruct institutional policies, living conditions, labor practices,
disciplinary methods, and medical care standards throughout the history of the House of
Reformation and Instruction for Colored Children;
(7) document all allegations and official findings of abuse, neglect, and
mistreatment of residents at the House of Reformation and Instruction for Colored
Children; and
(8) make recommendations for:
(i) the establishment of a permanent public memorial;
(ii) a formal process for the repatriation of identified remains and
the dignified reburial of unidentified remains;
(iii) policy changes to ensure the proper documentation and handling
of deaths in State custody; and
(iv) educational initiatives to incorporate this history into the State’s
curriculum.
(g) (1) The Principal Independent Investigator may request and receive
assistance, information, and documents from any State agency or unit of State government,
or any agency or political subdivision of the State.

HOUSE BILL 552 5
(2) Any agency or unit of government that receives a request under
paragraph (1) of this subsection shall comply with the request.
(h) (1) (i) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Principal
Independent Investigator is authorized to conduct archaeological surveys, test excavations,
and carry out the disinterment of human remains on the grounds of the House of
Reformation and Instruction for Colored Children without separate agency permits.
(ii) The Principal Independent Investigator shall consult with the
Maryland Historical Trust and the Maryland Department of Health regarding methods and
safety for actions authorized under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph.
(2) Title 17 of the Criminal Procedure Article of the Annotated Code of
Maryland requiring judicial authorization and a sworn affidavit regarding a suspected
homicide do not apply to a forensic genetic genealogical DNA analysis and a search
conducted by the Principal Independent Investigator if:
(i) the search is conducted exclusively for the humanitarian purpose
of identifying the deceased and notifying descendants;
(ii) biological samples are not used to screen for medical conditions
or traits; and
(iii) all DNA data is destroyed on the conclusion of the investigation.
(3) (i) Notwithstanding § 3–8A–27 of the Courts and Judicial
Proceedings Article of the Annotated Code of Maryland or the Maryland Public Information
Act, the Principal Independent Investigator and the Investigator’s designees acting in
furtherance of the duties specified under this section shall have full unrestricted access to
all sealed or otherwise confidential juvenile records, medical records, and administrative
files related to the House of Reformation and Instruction for Colored Children.
(ii) 1. Subject to subsubparagraph 2 of this subparagraph, the
Principal Independent Investigator shall maintain the confidentiality of any living
individual mentioned in the records under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph.
2. The Principal Independent Investigator may disclose the
names and circumstances of deceased individuals for the purposes of the final report of the
Independent Investigation and memorialization.
(4) The exemptions to general laws granted in this section are determined
by the General Assembly to be necessary due to the unique historical nature of the site for
which general laws are inapplicable.
(i) Funding for the Independent Investigation shall be as provided in the State
budget.

HOUSE BILL 552
(j) On or before December 31, 2028, the Principal Independent Investigator shall
report findings and recommendations of the Independent Investigation to the Governor
and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article of the Annotated Code
of Maryland, the General Assembly.
(A) THERE IS A COMMISSION ON THE HOUSE OF REFORMATION AND
INSTRUCTION FOR COLORED CHILDREN.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE COMMISSION IS TO:
(1) RESEARCH THE HISTORY, OPERATIONS, AND RESIDENT DEATHS
AT THE HOUSE OF REFORMATION AND INSTRUCTION FOR COLORED CHILDREN;
(2) PROVIDE A COMPLETE AND PUBLIC ACCOUNTING OF THE
CHILDREN WHO DIED AND WERE BURIED ON THE GROUNDS OF THE HOUSE OF
REFORMATION AND INSTRUCTION FOR COLORED CHILDREN;
(3) PROMOTE HEALING AND RECONCILIATION THROUGH
TRUTH–TELLING, ACKNOWLEDGMENT, AND RECOMMENDATIONS FOR SYSTEMIC
REFORM; AND
(4) ENSURE DESCENDANT AND COMMUNITY VOICE THROUGHOUT
THE INVESTIGATION AND RECONCILIATION PROCESS.
(C) THE COMMISSION CONSISTS OF:
(1) ONE MEMBER APPOINTED BY THE PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE OF
MARYLAND;
(2) ONE MEMBER APPOINTED BY THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF
DELEGATES;
(3) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL, OR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL’S
DESIGNEE;
(4) THE DIRECTOR OF THE MARYLAND HISTORICAL TRUST, OR THE
DIRECTOR’S DESIGNEE;
(5) THE SECRETARY OF VETERANS AND MILITARY FAMILIES, OR THE
SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE;

HOUSE BILL 552 7
(6) THE CHAIR OF THE PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY PLANNING
BOARD OF THE MARYLAND–NATIONAL CAPITAL PARK AND PLANNING
COMMISSION, OR THE CHAIR’S DESIGNEE;
(7) THE SECRETARY OF JUVENILE SERVICES, OR THE SECRETARY’S
DESIGNEE;
(8) THE CHIEF ARCHAEOLOGIST OF THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION’S STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION, OR THE CHIEF
ARCHAEOLOGIST’S DESIGNEE;
(9) THE STATE ARCHIVIST, OR THE STATE ARCHIVIST’S DESIGNEE;
(10) THE SECRETARY OF GENERAL SERVICES, OR THE SECRETARY’S
DESIGNEE;
(11) THE CHAIR OF THE MARYLAND COMMISSION ON AFRICAN
AMERICAN HISTORY AND CULTURE, OR THE CHAIR’S DESIGNEE;
(12) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE GIBSON–BANKS CENTER FOR
RACE AND LAW AT THE UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND FRANCIS KING CAREY SCHOOL
OF LAW, OR THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR’S DESIGNEE;
(13) THE PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY EXECUTIVE, OR THE COUNTY
EXECUTIVE’S DESIGNEE; AND
(14) THE SECRETARY OF HUMAN SERVICES, OR THE SECRETARY’S
DESIGNEE;
(15) THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT OF SCHOOLS, OR THE
SUPERINTENDENT’S DESIGNEE; AND
(16) UP TO SIX MEMBERS OF THE GENERAL PUBLIC APPOINTED BY THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL THAT SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) AT LEAST ONE DESCENDANT OF A CHILD BURIED AT THE
SITE, A FORMER RESIDENT OF THE HOUSE OF REFORMATION, OR A FORMER
JUSTICE–INVOLVED YOUTH;
(II) AT LEAST ONE ACADEMIC EXPERT IN FORENSIC
ANTHROPOLOGY, ARCHAEOLOGY, AFRICAN AMERICAN HISTORY, OR OTHER
RELATED DISCIPLINES;

HOUSE BILL 552
(III) AT LEAST ONE REPRESENTATIVE FROM A HISTORICALLY
BLACK COLLEGE OR UNIVERSITY IN THE STATE;
(IV) AT LEAST ONE REPRESENTATIVE FROM A CIVIL RIGHTS
ORGANIZATION; AND
(V) ANY OTHER COMMUNITY LEADER, ADVOCATE, OR EXPERT
THE ATTORNEY GENERAL DETERMINES APPROPRIATE TWO INDIVIDUALS WITH
EXPERIENCE IN CIVIL RIGHTS ADVOCACY AND LITIGATION.
(D) (1) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL SERVE AS CHAIR OF THE
COMMISSION.
(2) THE COMMISSION SHALL ELECT A VICE CHAIR FROM AMONG ITS
MEMBERS.
(E) MEMBERS APPOINTED BY THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL SERVE AT
THE PLEASURE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.
(F) (1) A MEMBER OF THE COMMISSION:
(I) MAY NOT RECEIVE COMPENSATION AS A MEMBER OF THE
COMMISSION; BUT
(II) IS ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES UNDER
THE STANDARD STATE TRAVEL REGULATIONS, AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE
BUDGET.
(2) THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY PROVIDE
STIPENDS TO DESCENDANT, FORMER RESIDENT, AND COMMUNITY MEMBERS TO
SUPPORT THE PARTICIPATION IN THE COMMISSION, SUBJECT TO AVAILABLE
FUNDS.
(G) THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL PROVIDE STAFF FOR
THE COMMISSION.
(H) THE COMMISSION SHALL:
(1) DIRECT AND OVERSEE THE INVESTIGATION OF THE HOUSE OF
REFORMATION AND INSTRUCTION FOR COLORED CHILDREN BY CONTRACTING
WITH QUALIFIED PROFESSIONAL EXPERTS, INCLUDING UNIVERSITIES, RESEARCH
INSTITUTIONS, AND INDEPENDENT PRACTITIONERS, TO CONDUCT:

HOUSE BILL 552 9
(I) FORENSIC ANTHROPOLOGY, ARCHAEOLOGICAL SURVEYS,
AND HISTORICAL RESEARCH TO THE HIGHEST ETHICAL AND PROFESSIONAL
STANDARDS;
(II) LOCATION AND DOCUMENTATION OF ALL GRAVES USING
MODERN ARCHAEOLOGICAL AND FORENSIC METHODS;
(III) IDENTIFICATION OF INDIVIDUALS BURIED AT THE SITE
THROUGH HISTORICAL RECORDS, FORENSIC ANALYSIS, DNA TESTING, AND
GENEALOGICAL RESEARCH;
(IV) RECONSTRUCTION OF INSTITUTIONAL CONDITIONS,
POLICIES, AND PRACTICES THROUGHOUT THE FACILITY’S HISTORY;
(V) DOCUMENTATION OF DEATHS, INCLUDING
CIRCUMSTANCES, CAUSES, AND STATE RESPONSES; AND
(VI) ANALYSIS OF SYSTEMIC FAILURES THAT ALLOWED HARMS
TO OCCUR;
(2) REVIEW AND APPROVE RESEARCH METHODOLOGIES, WORK
PLANS, AND FINDINGS PRODUCED BY CONTRACTED EXPERTS;
(3) WHEN APPROPRIATE AND APPROVED BY THE COMMISSION,
AUTHORIZE CONTRACTED EXPERTS TO CONDUCT EXHUMATION AND FORENSIC
ANALYSIS OF REMAINS IN ACCORDANCE WITH BEST PRACTICES IN FORENSIC
ANTHROPOLOGY AND BIOETHICS;
(4) DIRECT CONTRACTED EXPERTS TO ESTABLISH A DNA DATABASE
FOR DESCENDANT MATCHING AND PURSUE GENEALOGICAL RESEARCH TO LOCATE
AND NOTIFY DESCENDANTS;
(5) FACILITATE MEANINGFUL ENGAGEMENT WITH DESCENDANTS,
AFRICAN AMERICAN COMMUNITIES, AND OTHERS WITH HISTORICAL, FAMILIAL, OR
CULTURAL CONNECTIONS TO THOSE INTERRED AT THE SITE;
(6) PROVIDE OPPORTUNITIES FOR DESCENDANTS, SURVIVORS,
FORMER RESIDENTS, AND COMMUNITY MEMBERS TO SHARE TESTIMONY AND
PARTICIPATE IN PUBLIC ACKNOWLEDGMENT;
(7) ESTABLISH PROTOCOLS FOR DESCENDANT NOTIFICATION,
REBURIAL, AND CULTURALLY APPROPRIATE TREATMENT OF HUMAN REMAINS IN
CONSULTATION WITH CONTRACTED EXPERTS AND COMMUNITY STAKEHOLDERS;

HOUSE BILL 552
(8) OVERSEE CONTRACTED WORK FOR RESTORATION AND
PRESERVATION OF THE CEMETERY GROUNDS;
(9) RECOMMEND THE DESIGN AND THE IMPLEMENTATION OF A
PERMANENT MEMORIAL AT THE SITE;
(10) ENSURE LONG–TERM MAINTENANCE AND ACCESSIBILITY OF THE
PERMANENT MEMORIAL DESCRIBED UNDER ITEM (9) OF THIS SUBSECTION;
(11) RECOMMEND EDUCATIONAL INITIATIVES TO INCORPORATE THE
HISTORY OF THE HOUSE OF REFORMATION AND INSTRUCTION FOR COLORED
CHILDREN INTO THE STATE’S CURRICULUM;
(12) DOCUMENT AND DISSEMINATE LESSONS LEARNED FOR
EDUCATIONAL PURPOSES AND TO INFORM FUTURE STATE–LED RESTORATIVE
HISTORY INITIATIVES;
(13) MAKE FINDINGS REGARDING INSTITUTIONAL FAILURES AND
STATE ACCOUNTABILITY BASED ON RESEARCH CONDUCTED BY CONTRACTED
EXPERTS UNDER THIS SECTION;
(14) DEVELOP RECOMMENDATIONS FOR SYSTEMIC REFORM, WHICH
MAY INCLUDE:
(I) OFFICIAL STATE ACKNOWLEDGMENT AND FORMAL
APOLOGY;
(II) REPARATIVE MEASURES FOR DESCENDANTS AND
SURVIVORS;
(III) REFORMS TO PREVENT FUTURE DEATHS IN CUSTODY AND
IMPROVE CURRENT JUVENILE JUSTICE POLICIES;
(IV) ONGOING COMMEMORATION AND EDUCATION INITIATIVES;
AND
(V) ANY OTHER MEASURE THE COMMISSION DEEMS
APPROPRIATE TO PROMOTE HEALING AND RECONCILIATION; AND
(15) PERFORM OTHER DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES NECESSARY TO
ACCOMPLISH THE COMMISSION’S PURPOSES.

HOUSE BILL 552 11
(I) (1) THE SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPHS (2) AND (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY PROCURE GOODS AND SERVICES ON
BEHALF OF THE COMMISSION.
(2) THE EXECUTION OF A MAJOR CONTRACT REQUIRES APPROVAL BY
VOTE OF THE COMMISSION.
(3) TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE AND CONSISTENT WITH STATE AND
FEDERAL LAW, THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL PROCURE GOODS
AND SERVICES FROM MARYLAND INSTITUTIONS AND HISTORICALLY BLACK
COLLEGES AND UNIVERSITIES IN THE STATE.
(J) (1) ALL STATE AGENCIES, UNITS OF STATE GOVERNMENT, AND
POLITICAL SUBDIVISIONS OF THE STATE SHALL COOPERATE AND COMPLY WITH
INFORMATION REQUESTS FROM THE COMMISSION AND ITS CONTRACTED
RESEARCHERS AND SHALL PROVIDE ACCESS TO FACILITIES, RECORDS, AND
LOGISTICAL SUPPORT NECESSARY TO CONDUCT THE INVESTIGATION.
(2) THE COMMISSION, THROUGH THE ATTORNEY GENERAL, MAY
ISSUE SUBPOENAS FOR DOCUMENTS AND TESTIMONY RELEVANT TO THE
INVESTIGATION.
(K) (1) (I) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, THE
COMMISSION AND ITS CONTRACTORS ARE AUTHORIZED TO CONDUCT
ARCHAEOLOGICAL SURVEYS AND TEST EXCAVATIONS AND CARRY OUT THE
DISINTERMENT OF HUMAN REMAINS ON THE GROUNDS OF THE HOUSE OF
REFORMATION AND INSTRUCTION FOR COLORED CHILDREN WITHOUT SEPARATE
AGENCY PERMITS.
(II) THE COMMISSION SHALL CONSULT WITH THE MARYLAND
HISTORICAL TRUST AND THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH REGARDING
METHODS AND SAFETY FOR ACTIONS AUTHORIZED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH.
(2) TITLE 17 OF THE CRIMINAL PROCEDURE ARTICLE REQUIRING
JUDICIAL AUTHORIZATION AND A SWORN AFFIDAVIT REGARDING A SUSPECTED
HOMICIDE DOES NOT APPLY TO A FORENSIC GENETIC GENEALOGICAL DNA
ANALYSIS AND A SEARCH CONDUCTED BY THE PRINCIPAL INDEPENDENT
INVESTIGATOR COMMISSION, IF:
(I) THE SEARCH IS CONDUCTED EXCLUSIVELY FOR THE
HUMANITARIAN PURPOSE OF IDENTIFYING THE DECEASED AND NOTIFYING
DESCENDANTS;

HOUSE BILL 552
(II) BIOLOGICAL SAMPLES ARE NOT USED TO SCREEN FOR
MEDICAL CONDITIONS OR TRAITS; AND
(III) ALL DNA DATA IS DESTROYED ON THE CONCLUSION OF THE
INVESTIGATION.
(3) (I) NOTWITHSTANDING § 3–8A–27 OF THE COURTS ARTICLE
OR THE MARYLAND PUBLIC INFORMATION ACT, THE COMMISSION AND THE
COMMISSION’S CONTRACTORS ACTING IN FURTHERANCE OF THE DUTIES SPECIFIED
UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL HAVE FULL, UNRESTRICTED ACCESS TO ALL SEALED
OR OTHERWISE CONFIDENTIAL JUVENILE RECORDS, MEDICAL RECORDS, AND
ADMINISTRATIVE FILES RELATED TO THE HOUSE OF REFORMATION AND
INSTRUCTION FOR COLORED CHILDREN.
(II) 1. SUBJECT TO SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 2 OF THIS
SUBPARAGRAPH, THE COMMISSION SHALL MAINTAIN THE CONFIDENTIALITY OF
ANY LIVING INDIVIDUAL MENTIONED IN THE RECORDS UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I)
OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
2. THE COMMISSION MAY DISCLOSE THE NAMES AND
CIRCUMSTANCES OF DECEASED INDIVIDUALS FOR THE PURPOSES OF REPORTS AND
MEMORIALIZATION.
(4) THE EXEMPTIONS TO GENERAL LAWS GRANTED IN THIS SECTION
ARE DETERMINED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY TO BE NECESSARY DUE TO THE
UNIQUE HISTORICAL NATURE OF THE SITE FOR WHICH GENERAL LAWS ARE
INAPPLICABLE.
(L) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, FUNDING FOR
THE COMMISSION SHALL BE AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET.
(2) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY PURSUE FEDERAL GRANTS AND
OTHER FUNDING SOURCES TO SUPPLEMENT STATE APPROPRIATIONS, SUBJECT TO
COMMISSION APPROVAL OF GRANT APPLICATIONS.
(3) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL ADMINISTER FUNDING FOR THE
COMMISSION, INCLUDING STATE APPROPRIATIONS, FEDERAL GRANTS, AND
PRIVATE DONATIONS DESIGNATED FOR THIS PURPOSE.
(M) (1) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2027, THE COMMISSION SHALL
SUBMIT AN INITIAL REPORT DOCUMENTING THE PROGRESS OF THE INVESTIGATION
AND INCLUDING ANY PRELIMINARY RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE GOVERNOR AND,
IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THIS ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.

HOUSE BILL 552 13
(2) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2029, THE COMMISSION SHALL
SUBMIT A FINAL REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257
OF THIS ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON:
(I) THE COMPLETE FINDINGS OF THE COMMISSION’S
RESEARCH;
(II) ALL IDENTIFIED INDIVIDUALS AND THE CIRCUMSTANCES
OF THEIR DEATHS;
(III) HISTORICAL ANALYSIS OF INSTITUTIONAL POLICIES AND
PRACTICES;
(IV) RECOMMENDATIONS FOR ACKNOWLEDGMENT, MEMORIAL,
REBURIAL, REPARATIVE MEASURES, AND POLICY REFORMS; AND
(V) AN ACCOUNTING OF THE COMMISSION’S EXPENDITURES.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted shall take effect July 1, 2026. It shall remain effective through July 1, 2029, for a
period of 4 years and, at the end of June 30, 2029 2030, this Act, with no further action
required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.